Citations · 43

modelcontextprotocol.io
modelcontextprotocol.io

1
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/getting-started/intro
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/getting-started/intro

2
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/extensions/auth/enterprise-managed-authorization
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/extensions/auth/enterprise-managed-authorization

3
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-03-26/changelog
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-03-26/changelog

5
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/develop/clients/client-best-practices
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/develop/clients/client-best-practices

9
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/tutorials/security/security_best_practices
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/tutorials/security/security_best_practices

10
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-11-25
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-11-25

13
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/development/roadmap
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/development/roadmap

14
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/basic/transports
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/basic/transports

15
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-11-25/basic/authorization
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-11-25/basic/authorization

16
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/learn/architecture
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/learn/architecture

23
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-11-25/changelog
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-11-25/changelog

24
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/changelog
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/changelog

27
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/seps/1024-mcp-client-security-requirements-for-local-server-
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/seps/1024-mcp-client-security-requirements-for-local-server-

28
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/registry/about
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/registry/about

29
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/seps/414-request-meta
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/seps/414-request-meta

34
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/extensions/auth/oauth-client-credentials
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/extensions/auth/oauth-client-credentials

36
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/draft/changelog
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/draft/changelog

37
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/learn/server-concepts
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/learn/server-concepts

38
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/clients
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/clients

39
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/develop/build-server
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/docs/develop/build-server

40
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/client/roots
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/client/roots

41
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/client/sampling
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/client/sampling

42
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/client/elicitation
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-06-18/client/elicitation

43
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-11-25/basic/utilities/tasks
https://modelcontextprotocol.io/specification/2025-11-25/basic/utilities/tasks
simonwillison.net
simonwillison.net

4
https://simonwillison.net/2025/Apr/9/mcp-prompt-injection/
https://simonwillison.net/2025/Apr/9/mcp-prompt-injection/
blog.modelcontextprotocol.io
blog.modelcontextprotocol.io

6
https://blog.modelcontextprotocol.io/posts/2025-09-08-mcp-registry-preview/
https://blog.modelcontextprotocol.io/posts/2025-09-08-mcp-registry-preview/

11
https://blog.modelcontextprotocol.io/posts/2025-12-09-mcp-joins-agentic-ai-foundation/
https://blog.modelcontextprotocol.io/posts/2025-12-09-mcp-joins-agentic-ai-foundation/

22
https://blog.modelcontextprotocol.io/posts/2026-01-26-mcp-apps/
https://blog.modelcontextprotocol.io/posts/2026-01-26-mcp-apps/

25
https://blog.modelcontextprotocol.io/posts/2025-12-19-mcp-transport-future/
https://blog.modelcontextprotocol.io/posts/2025-12-19-mcp-transport-future/
learn.microsoft.com
learn.microsoft.com

7
https://learn.microsoft.com/en-us/dynamics365/fin-ops-core/dev-itpro/copilot/copilot-mcp
https://learn.microsoft.com/en-us/dynamics365/fin-ops-core/dev-itpro/copilot/copilot-mcp

18
https://learn.microsoft.com/en-us/microsoft-copilot-studio/agent-extend-action-mcp
https://learn.microsoft.com/en-us/microsoft-copilot-studio/agent-extend-action-mcp
docs.langchain.com
docs.langchain.com

8
https://docs.langchain.com/oss/python/langchain/overview
https://docs.langchain.com/oss/python/langchain/overview
julsimon.medium.com
julsimon.medium.com

12
https://julsimon.medium.com/why-mcps-disregard-for-40-years-of-rpc-best-practices-will-burn-enterprises-8ef85ce5bc9b
https://julsimon.medium.com/why-mcps-disregard-for-40-years-of-rpc-best-practices-will-burn-enterprises-8ef85ce5bc9b
developers.openai.com
developers.openai.com

17
https://developers.openai.com/apps-sdk/
https://developers.openai.com/apps-sdk/

31
https://developers.openai.com/api/docs/guides/function-calling
https://developers.openai.com/api/docs/guides/function-calling
github.blog
github.blog

19
https://github.blog/changelog/2026-01-28-github-mcp-server-new-projects-tools-oauth-scope-filtering-and-new-features/
https://github.blog/changelog/2026-01-28-github-mcp-server-new-projects-tools-oauth-scope-filtering-and-new-features/
geminicli.com
geminicli.com

20
https://geminicli.com/docs/tools/mcp-server/
https://geminicli.com/docs/tools/mcp-server/
developers.cloudflare.com
developers.cloudflare.com

21
https://developers.cloudflare.com/agents/model-context-protocol/mcp-servers-for-cloudflare/
https://developers.cloudflare.com/agents/model-context-protocol/mcp-servers-for-cloudflare/
github.com
github.com

26
https://github.com/BeehiveInnovations/zen-mcp-server/issues/255
https://github.com/BeehiveInnovations/zen-mcp-server/issues/255

30
https://github.com/github/github-mcp-server/issues/1683
https://github.com/github/github-mcp-server/issues/1683
anthropic.com
anthropic.com

32
https://www.anthropic.com/engineering/equipping-agents-for-the-real-world-with-agent-skills
https://www.anthropic.com/engineering/equipping-agents-for-the-real-world-with-agent-skills
gofastmcp.com
gofastmcp.com

33
https://gofastmcp.com/getting-started/welcome
https://gofastmcp.com/getting-started/welcome
cloud.google.com
cloud.google.com

35
https://cloud.google.com/blog/products/networking/grpc-as-a-native-transport-for-mcp
https://cloud.google.com/blog/products/networking/grpc-as-a-native-transport-for-mcp
Sources scanned · 476

tomshardware.com
tomshardware.com
Anthropic's Model Context Protocol includes a critical remote code execution vulnerability - newly discovered exploit puts 200,000 AI servers at risk


Security researchers at OX Security have uncovered a critical remote code execution vulnerability in Anthropic's Model Context Protocol (MCP), affecting its official SDKs in Python, TypeScript, Java, and Rust. The issue stems from insecure STDIO handling, where unsanitized user input is directly executed, impacting up to 200,000 server instances and over 150 million downloads. Despite the severity, Anthropic declined to patch the flaw, considering it “expected behavior.” MCP, an open standard enabling AI model integration with external tools, was donated to the Linux Foundation but remains maintained by Anthropic. Major platforms including OpenAI and Google have adopted it. OX identified four major exploitation vectors, including UI injection, prompt injection in IDEs, bypasses in hardened tools, and supply chain poisoning. They successfully infiltrated 9 of 11 MCP registries, executing code on six live systems. At least 10 critical CVEs have been issued, with only some patched. The researchers urged protocol-level fixes, such as command whitelisting, but Anthropic declined. This vulnerability disclosure follows a recent source code leak from Anthropic and raises questions about the company’s internal security practices, especially after launching Claude Mythos, a new AI model touted for its security testing capabilities.

modelcontextprotocol.io
modelcontextprotocol.io
Transports


Security Warning. When implementing Streamable HTTP transport: Servers MUST validate the Origin header on all incoming connections to prevent DNS rebinding ...Read more

Specification


18 Jun 2025 — Security and Trust & Safety. The Model Context Protocol enables powerful capabilities through arbitrary data access and code execution paths.Read more

Security Best Practices


Purpose and Scope. This document provides security considerations for the Model Context Protocol (MCP), complementing the MCP Authorization specification.Read more

Authorization


18 Jun 2025 — This specification defines the authorization flow for HTTP-based transports. ​. Protocol Requirements. Authorization is OPTIONAL for MCP ...Read more

Transports


Security Warning. When implementing Streamable HTTP transport: Servers MUST validate the Origin header on all incoming connections to prevent DNS rebinding ...Read more

Understanding Authorization in MCP


Learn how to implement secure authorization for MCP servers using OAuth 2.1 to protect sensitive resources and operations.

Key Changes


25 Nov 2025 — This document lists changes made to the Model Context Protocol (MCP) specification since the previous revision, 2025-06-18. ​. Major changes.Read more

Architecture overview


The official Sentry MCP server runs on the Sentry platform, and uses the Streamable HTTP transport. This is commonly referred to as a “remote” MCP server. ​.Read more

Transports


18 Jun 2025 — The protocol is transport-agnostic and can be implemented over any communication channel that supports bidirectional message exchange.Read more

MCP Apps


MCP Apps is an extension to the core MCP specification. Host support varies by client. MCP Apps are currently supported by Claude, Claude Desktop, VS Code ...Read more

The MCP Registry


The MCP Registry is the official centralized metadata repository for publicly accessible MCP servers, backed by major trusted contributors to the MCP ...Read more

SEP-1319: Decouple Request Payload from RPC Methods ...


The current MCP specification tightly couples the data payload of a request with the JSON-RPC method that transports it. This design presents several challenges ...

Specification


25 Nov 2025 — MCP provides a standardized way for applications to: Share contextual information with language models; Expose tools and capabilities to AI ...Read more

Server Card Charter


26 Mar 2026 — Discovery Mechanism: Specification of how an MCP Server Card document is discovered (well-known URL, resource-based discovery, etc.). Cross ...Read more

SEP-1865: MCP Apps - Interactive User Interfaces for MCP


21 Nov 2025 — MCP Apps introduces a standardized pattern for declaring UI resources via the ui:// URI scheme, associating them with tools through metadata, ...Read more

Authorization


The Model Context Protocol provides authorization capabilities at the transport level, enabling MCP clients to make requests to restricted MCP servers on ...Read more

Lifecycle


26 Mar 2025 — The Model Context Protocol (MCP) defines a rigorous lifecycle for client-server connections that ensures proper capability negotiation and state management.Read more

Extensions Overview


MCP Extensions. MCP extensions are optional additions to the specification that define capabilities beyond the core protocol.Read more

Resources


18 Jun 2025 — The Model Context Protocol (MCP) provides a standardized way for servers to expose resources to clients. Resources allow servers to share ...Read more

Key Changes


This document lists changes made to the Model Context Protocol (MCP) specification since the previous revision, 2024-11-05.Read more

Key Changes


This document lists changes made to the Model Context Protocol (MCP) specification since the previous revision, 2025-03-26.Read more

Specification


Model Context Protocol (MCP) is an open protocol that enables seamless integration between LLM applications and external data sources and tools.Read more

Resources


You are viewing an older version (2025-03-26) of the specification. View the latest version (2025-11-25). The Model Context Protocol (MCP) ...Read more

Authorization


You are viewing an older version (2025-03-26) of the specification. View the latest version (2025-11-25). ​. Introduction. ​. Purpose and Scope.Read more

Schema Reference


You are viewing an older version (2025-06-18) of the specification. View the latest version (2025-11-25) ... Describes the name and version of an MCP ...Read more

https://modelcontextprotocol.io/sitemap.xml


... mcp/charter</loc> <lastmod>2026-04-16T17:20:18.263Z</lastmod> </url> <url> ... specification/2024-11-05/architecture</loc> <lastmod>2026-04-23T01:41 ...Read more

Architecture


You are viewing an older version (2025-03-26) of the specification. View the latest version (2025-11-25). The Model Context Protocol (MCP) ...Read more

SEP-1577: Sampling With Tools


30 Sept 2025 — This allows MCP servers to run their own agentic loops using the client's tokens (still under the user supervision), and reduces the complexity ...Read more

Tools


You are viewing an older version (2025-03-26) of the specification. View the latest version (2025-11-25). The Model Context Protocol (MCP) ...Read more

Versioning Published MCP Servers


2025.6.18, semantic date, Recommended (⚠️Caution!⚠️) ; 2025.06.18, non-semantic date, Allowed (⚠️Caution!⚠️) ; 2025-06-18, non-semantic date, Allowed ; v1.0, prefixed ...Read more

llms - full.txt


<McpClient name="AgentAI"> AgentAI is a Rust library designed to simplify the creation of AI agents. The library includes seamless integration with MCP Servers.Read more

Enterprise-Managed Authorization


How it works. The extension establishes a delegated authorization flow where the enterprise IdP acts as an intermediary between the MCP client and the MCP ...Read more

OAuth Client Credentials


The OAuth Client Credentials extension ( io.modelcontextprotocol/oauth-client-credentials ) adds support for the OAuth 2.0 client credentials flow to MCP. This ...Read more

Authorization Extensions


The ext-auth repository contains official MCP extensions that add authorization capabilities beyond the core MCP specification. These extensions address ...Read more

Authorization


25 Nov 2025 — MCP Authorization Extensions. There are several authorization extensions to the core protocol that define additional authorization mechanisms.Read more

Example Clients


Apify MCP Tester is an open-source client that connects to any MCP server using Server-Sent Events (SSE). It is a standalone Apify Actor designed for testing ...

Extension Support Matrix


This matrix shows which MCP clients support each official extension. Extensions are always opt-in — a client only uses an extension if both client and ...Read more

SEP-2133: Extensions


21 Jan 2025 — This SEP defines Official Extensions and Experimental Extensions. Experimental extensions are maintained within the MCP organization as an ...Read more

Build an MCP App


The fastest way to create an MCP App is using an AI coding agent with the MCP Apps skill. If you prefer to set up a project manually, skip to Manual setup. ​.Read more

llms.txt


... MCP integrations - [Antitrust Policy](https://modelcontextprotocol.io/community/antitrust.md): MCP Project Antitrust Policy for participants and ...Read more

SEP-991: Enable URL-based Client Registration using ...


7 Jul 2025 — A common scenario is an MCP server developer wanting to restrict usage to a set of clients they trust. ​. Key Innovation: Server-Controlled ...

SEP-985: Align OAuth 2.0 Protected Resource Metadata ...


16 Jul 2025 — Abstract. This proposal brings the MCP spec's handling of OAuth 2.0 Protected Resource Metadata in line with RFC 9728.

SEP-1302: Formalize Working Groups and Interest Groups ...


5 Aug 2025 — The Steering group has had a long-standing practice of managing a handful of collaborative groups through Discord channels (e.g. security, auth, ...Read more

Roadmap


5 Mar 2026 — Enterprise-managed auth: paved paths away from static client secrets ... manage MCP access the same way they manage everything else.Read more

What is the Model Context Protocol (MCP)?


Think of MCP like a USB-C port for AI applications. Just as USB-C provides a standardized way to connect electronic devices, MCP provides a standardized way ...Read more

SDK Tiering System


The MCP SDK Tiering System establishes clear expectations for feature completeness, protocol support, and maintenance commitments across official and ...Read more

File Uploads Charter


3 days ago — The File Uploads Working Group exists to define how MCP tools and elicitation requests declare file inputs so that hosts can present native file ...Read more

anthropic.com
anthropic.com
Introducing the Model Context Protocol


25 Nov 2024 — The Model Context Protocol is an open standard that enables developers to build secure, two-way connections between their data sources and AI-powered tools.Read more

Code execution with MCP: building more efficient AI agents


4 Nov 2025 — Since launching MCP in November 2024, adoption has been rapid: the community has built thousands of MCP servers, SDKs are available for all ...Read more

Introducing Claude Opus 4.7


Claude Opus 4.7 is measurably better than Opus 4.6 for Bolt's longer-running app-building work, up to 10% better in the best cases, without the ...Read more

Anthropic Academy: Claude API Development Guide


Learn to build applications with Claude's API. Find detailed documentation, integration guides, code examples, and best practices for developing with our AI ...

Introducing Labs


Anthropic is an AI safety and research company that's working to build reliable, interpretable, and steerable AI systems.

Donating the Model Context Protocol and establishing ...


9 Dec 2025 — MCP now has an official, community-driven Registry for discovering available MCP servers, and the November 25th spec release introduced many ...Read more

Introducing Claude Opus 4.6


5 Feb 2026 — The new Claude Opus 4.6 improves on its predecessor's coding skills. It plans more carefully, sustains agentic tasks for longer, can operate ...Read more

Scaling Managed Agents: Decoupling the brain from ...


8 Apr 2026 — Claude calls MCP tools via a dedicated proxy; this proxy takes in a token associated with the session. The proxy can then fetch the ...Read more

Apple's Xcode now supports the Claude Agent SDK


Developers using Claude Code can integrate with Xcode over MCP and capture visual Previews without leaving the CLI. Availability. Xcode 26.3 is ...Read more

Newsroom


Anthropic is an AI safety and research company that's working to build reliable, interpretable, and steerable AI systems.

One-click MCP server installation for Claude Desktop


26 Jun 2025 — Desktop Extensions make installing MCP servers as easy as clicking a button. We share the technical architecture and tips for creating good extensions.Read more

Introducing Claude Sonnet 4.6


For Claude in Excel users, our add-in now supports MCP connectors, letting Claude work with the other tools you use day-to-day, like S&P Global, ...Read more

making Claude Code more secure and autonomous


20 Oct 2025 — In Claude Code, Claude writes, tests, and debugs code alongside you, navigating your codebase, editing multiple files, and running commands ...Read more

Advancing Claude for Financial Services


27 Oct 2025 — In the Claude apps, Claude can also create and edit files, including Excel spreadsheets and PowerPoint slides, and connect to Microsoft 365 to ...Read more

Claude Opus 4.5 System Card


24 Nov 2025 — After extensive strangely conflicted justifications of both similar answer options, the model chooses E, which was the expected answer.Read more

Introducing advanced tool use on the Claude Developer ...


24 Nov 2025 — Our blog article on using code execution with MCP discussed how tool results and definitions can sometimes consume 50,000+ tokens before an ...Read more

Effective context engineering for AI agents


29 Sept 2025 — Context is a critical but finite resource for AI agents. In this post, we explore strategies for effectively curating and managing the context ...Read more

Equipping agents for the real world with Agent Skills


16 Oct 2025 — Skills extend Claude's capabilities by packaging your expertise into composable resources for Claude, transforming general-purpose agents into ...Read more

Anthropic's Transparency Hub


29 Jan 2026 — We created the Model Context Protocol (MCP) as an open source project in 2024. We have since donated MCP to the newly created Agentic AI ...Read more

Trustworthy agents in practice


9 Apr 2026 — We created the Model Context Protocol as an open standard for how models ... Foundation's Agentic AI Foundation so that it belongs to the broader ...Read more

Claude for Financial Services


15 Jul 2025 — The Financial Analysis Solution unifies your financial data—from market feeds to internal data stored in platforms like Databricks and Snowflake ...Read more

blog.modelcontextprotocol.io
blog.modelcontextprotocol.io
Announcement


MCP joins the Agentic AI Foundation. Today marks a major milestone for the Model Context Protocol. Anthropic is donating MCP to the Agentic AI Foundation, a ...Read more

Exploring the Future of MCP Transports


19 Dec 2025 — The Streamable HTTP transport was a significant step forward, enabling remote MCP deployments and unlocking new use cases. However, as ...Read more

Update on the Next MCP Protocol Release


26 Sept 2025 — The specification release date remains to be November 25th, 2025. Release Timeline#. The next version of the Model Context Protocol ...Read more

MCP Apps: Extending servers with interactive user interfaces


21 Nov 2025 — MCP Apps Extension introduces a standardized pattern for declaring UI resources, linking them to tools, and enabling bidirectional communication ...Read more

Introducing the MCP Registry | Model Context Protocol Blog


8 Sept 2025 — Introducing the MCP Registry. Launching the MCP Registry in preview: an open catalog and API for discovering publicly available MCP servers.Read more

MCP Apps - Bringing UI Capabilities To MCP Clients


26 Jan 2026 — Tools can now return interactive UI components that render directly in the conversation: dashboards, forms, visualizations, multi-step workflows ...Read more

One Year of MCP: November 2025 Spec Release


25 Nov 2025 — MCP turns one — a look back at the year, plus the full details of the November 2025 specification release.

Roadmap


Release Timeline The next version of the Model Context Protocol specification will be released on November 25th, 2025, with a release candidate (RC) available ...Read more

Mcp | Model Context Protocol Blog


MCP's current spec release came out in November 2025. We haven't cut a new version since, but the project hasn't stood still. Over the past year MCP has ...Read more

Posts


MCP's current spec release came out in November 2025. We haven't cut a new version since, but the project hasn't stood still. Over the past year MCP has moved ...Read more

MCP joins the Agentic AI Foundation


9 Dec 2025 — Anthropic is donating MCP to the newly formed Agentic AI Foundation under the Linux Foundation, ensuring vendor-neutral governance for the ...

modelcontextprotocol.info
modelcontextprotocol.info
MCP Protocol Blog


Today marks a major milestone for the Model Context Protocol. Anthropic is donating MCP to the Agentic AI Foundation, a directed fund under the Linux Foundation ...Read more

raygun.com
raygun.com
Engineering AI systems with Model Context Protocol - Raygun


18 Dec 2024 — On November 26, 2024, Anthropic released the Model Context Protocol (MCP)—an open standard for data exchange between applications and data ...Read more

wwt.com
wwt.com
Model Context Protocol (MCP) - A Deep Dive


20 Apr 2025 — Model Context Protocol (MCP), released by Anthropic in November 2024, has taken the Generative AI world by storm, claiming to offer a new ...Read more

iaee.substack.com
iaee.substack.com
Model Context Protocol — Intuitively and Exhaustively Explained


In this article, we'll discuss “Model Context Protocol” (MCP), a new standard allowing AI to talk to external systems.Read more

wandb.ai
wandb.ai
The Model Context Protocol (MCP) by Anthropic: Origins, ...


8 Mar 2025 — In late November 2024, Anthropic introduced the Model Context Protocol (MCP) – an open standard for connecting AI models (like large ...Read more

thoughtworks.com
thoughtworks.com
The Model Context Protocol: Getting beneath the hype


15 May 2025 — Released in November 2024 by Anthropic, the Model Context Protocol is an open standard that defines and stabilizes the way developers build ...Read more

theverge.com
theverge.com
Anthropic launches tool to connect AI systems directly to datasets


Anthropic has introduced a new open-source tool called the Model Context Protocol (MCP) that enables AI assistants to directly connect to various data sources, enhancing their information retrieval and task execution capabilities. This universal protocol aims to simplify integration across different AI systems and data, addressing the current need for custom coding for each dataset. The MCP allows developers to integrate once and connect seamlessly to multiple data sources. For example, using the Claude desktop app, Anthropic demonstrated how MCP could connect directly to GitHub, create a new repository, and make a pull request in under an hour. Companies like Replit, Codeium, and Souregraph have already adopted MCP for their AI agents. MCP aims to address fragmented integrations by providing a standardized protocol that maintains context as AI systems interact with different tools and datasets, fostering a more sustainable architecture for future AI developments.

Windows is getting support for the 'USB-C of AI apps'


Microsoft is advancing its AI integration in Windows by supporting the Model Context Protocol (MCP), dubbed the "USB-C of AI apps," and launching the Windows AI Foundry. MCP, introduced by Anthropic, allows AI apps to connect seamlessly with other software, services, and Windows components. This move is part of Microsoft’s vision for a Windows environment where AI agents play a central, interactive role. MCP servers will access core Windows features like the file system and Subsystem for Linux, creating more intuitive, automated functions within apps. For example, Perplexity can use MCP to search user documents via natural language rather than manual folder navigation. To ensure secure implementation, Microsoft is initially releasing MCP support to selected developers. Security measures include a controlled MCP registry, user consent prompts, and adherence to strict guidelines to prevent issues like token theft and prompt injections. Microsoft is also rebranding its AI infrastructure under the Windows AI Foundry, integrating with tools like Foundry Local, Ollama, and Nvidia NIMs, thereby simplifying AI model deployment. The company is collaborating with hardware partners such as AMD, Intel, Nvidia, and Qualcomm to support this ecosystem. Overall, Microsoft aims to balance innovation with robust security and user experience.

AI companies want a new internet - and they think they've found the key


Over the past 18 months, major AI companies including OpenAI, Google, Microsoft, and Anthropic have coalesced around a new standard called MCP (Model Context Protocol), aimed at enabling AI agents to access tools, apps, and data over the internet in a consistent and standardized manner. Initially built as a side project by Anthropic engineers, MCP has rapidly become the de facto industry standard, allowing AI agents to interact more effectively with services—much like APIs enabled the explosive growth of Web 2.0. Anthropic has now donated MCP to the Linux Foundation and joined forces with other key players to form the Agentic AI Foundation (AAIF) to promote open-source development in agentic AI. MCP’s success lies in its ability to simplify integration between AI models and digital services, enhancing speed, reliability, and automation. It allows AIs like Claude to "converse" with tools like Slack more efficiently—streamlining complex tasks into seamless agent interactions. Its future, however, remains uncertain amidst wider adoption, competition, and the need for strong security standards. Nevertheless, the shift toward open collaboration and more transparent protocols marks a pivotal moment in building a more functional, AI-driven internet.

techradar.com
techradar.com
'This is not a traditional coding error': Experts flag potentially critical security issues at the heart of Anthropic's MCP, exposes 150 million downloads and thousands of servers to complete takeover


Security researchers from Ox have uncovered a critical and systemic vulnerability in Anthropic's Model Context Protocol (MCP), a core AI system used for securely connecting models to external data sources and applications. The flaw reportedly affects every SDK implementation of MCP—in Python, TypeScript, Java, and Rust—placing over 150 million downloads, 200,000 instances, and more than 7,000 publicly accessible servers at risk of remote code execution (RCE). Unlike typical coding errors, this vulnerability stems from architectural design choices in the MCP protocol. The issue allows attacks ranging from prompt injections in AI IDEs to unauthorized UI manipulations and malicious marketplaces exploits. Major platforms such as LiteLLM, LangChain, and IBM’s LangFlow are impacted. Despite Ox having issued 10 CVEs and assisting with bug fixes, they emphasize that the core problem in the protocol remains unresolved. While Ox recommended permanent patches, Anthropic responded that MCP is functioning as intended. The flaw's widespread use across leading AI tools, including products from OpenAI, DeepMind, and Anthropic's own Claude apps, raises significant industry-wide security concerns.

Anthropic's official Git MCP server had some worrying security flaws - this is what happened next


In January 2026, Anthropic resolved multiple critical security flaws in its Git Model Context Protocol (MCP) server, a tool enabling AI systems to interact with Git repositories. Discovered by the security startup Cyata, the vulnerabilities—CVE-2025-68145 (path validation bypass), CVE-2025-68143 (unrestricted git_init), and CVE-2025-68144 (argument injection in git_diff)—could be chained with the Filesystem MCP server to achieve remote code execution (RCE) or file tampering via prompt injection. Cyata emphasized the risk of combining seemingly secure components in agentic AI systems, warning that complex integrations may produce unforeseen security gaps. Although the issues were reported in June 2025, Anthropic released a fix in December 2025 (version 2025.12.18). No exploitation in the wild has been reported. The news follows recent disclosures that Claude, Anthropic’s AI, had been involved in a sophisticated cyber espionage campaign, further underlining the emerging security challenges in AI-enabled environments, especially as businesses rapidly integrate such technologies.

registry.modelcontextprotocol.io
registry.modelcontextprotocol.io
Official MCP Registry - Model Context Protocol


io.github.kubeshark/mcp. v53.2.2. Real-time Kubernetes network traffic visibility and API analysis for HTTP, gRPC, Redis, Kafka, DNS. Updated 4/ ...

Official MCP Registry


Official MCP Registry. Discover Model Context Protocol servers. GitHub Docs API Reference. Recently Updated ...Read more

Official MCP Registry Reference


A community driven registry service for Model Context Protocol (MCP) servers. GitHub repository | Documentation.Read more

prod.registry.modelcontextprotocol.io
prod.registry.modelcontextprotocol.io
Official MCP Registry


kubeshark/mcp. v53.2.2. Real-time Kubernetes network traffic visibility and API analysis for HTTP, gRPC, Redis, Kafka, DNS.Read more

apps.extensions.modelcontextprotocol.io
apps.extensions.modelcontextprotocol.io
MCP Apps Overview


MCP Apps Overview. MCP Apps is an extension to the Model Context Protocol that enables MCP servers to deliver interactive user interfaces to hosts.Read more

pypi.org
pypi.org
FastMCP


Latest version. Released: Apr 13, 2026. The fast, Pythonic way to build MCP servers and clients. Navigation. Project description; Release history; Download ...Read more

fastmcp 2.0.0


11 Apr 2025 — Newer version available (3.2.4). Released: Apr 11, 2025. An ergonomic MCP interface. Navigation. Project description; Release history; Download ...Read more

fastmcp 1.0


11 Apr 2025 — FastMCP makes building MCP servers simple and intuitive. Create tools, expose resources, and define prompts with clean, Pythonic code.Read more

mcp


The Model Context Protocol (MCP) lets you build servers that expose data and functionality to LLM applications in a secure, standardized way.Read more

fastmcp · PyPI


30 Nov 2024 — FastMCP is a high-level, intuitive framework for building Model Context Protocol (MCP) servers with Python.Read more

permit-fastmcp


21 Jul 2025 — A FastMCP middleware that adds Permit.io authorization to your MCP servers. This middleware intercepts MCP requests and validates them against ...Read more

fastmcp-docs


FastMCP Docs. Swagger-style documentation generator for FastMCP servers. Automatically creates beautiful, interactive API documentation from your FastMCP ...Read more

orange-things-fastmcp


14 Apr 2025 — This Model Context Protocol (MCP) server lets you use Claude Desktop to interact with your task management data in Things app. You can ask ...Read more

mcp 1.10.1


27 Jun 2025 — Note: Streamable HTTP transport is superseding SSE transport for production deployments. from mcp.server.fastmcp import FastMCP # Stateful ...Read more

fastmcp 0.4.1


9 Dec 2024 — Key features: Fast: High-level interface means less code and faster development; Simple: Build MCP servers with minimal boilerplate; Pythonic: ...Read more

gofastmcp.com
gofastmcp.com
FastMCP Updates


FastMCP v3.0.0: Three at Last. FastMCP 3.0 is stable. Two betas, two release candidates, 21 new contributors, and more than 100,000 pre- ...Read more

Welcome to FastMCP 2.0!


This documentation reflects FastMCP's main branch, meaning it always reflects the latest development version. Features are generally marked with version ...Read more

Changelog


GitHub forwards all links, PyPI is the same, imports are the same. A major version felt like the right moment to make it official. ​. Build servers from ...Read more

FastMCP Updates


FastMCP 2.10 achieves full compliance with the 6/18/2025 MCP specification update, introducing powerful new communication patterns. Elicitation Support enables ...Read more

Welcome to FastMCP - FastMCP


This documentation reflects FastMCP's main branch, meaning it always reflects the latest development version. Features are generally marked with version badges ...Read more

Changelog


FastMCP 2.10 brings full compliance with the 6/18/2025 MCP spec update, introducing elicitation support for dynamic server-client communication and output ...Read more

The FastMCP Client


New in version 2.0.0 The fastmcp.Client class provides a programmatic interface for interacting with any MCP server. It handles protocol details and ...Read more

Resources & Templates


New in version 2.11.0 Optional meta information about the resource. This data is passed through to the MCP client as the _meta field of the client- ...Read more

The FastMCP Server


The FastMCP class is the central piece of every FastMCP application. It acts as the container for your tools, resources, and prompts, managing communication ...Read more

Tool Search


Replace large tool catalogs with on-demand search. ... Adjust max_results based on your catalog size and how much context you want the LLM to receive per search:.Read more

Transforms Overview


Tool Search - Replace large tool catalogs with on-demand search; Resources as Tools - Expose resources to tool-only clients; Prompts as Tools - Expose prompts ...Read more

Apps


New in version 3.0.0 MCP tools normally return text. That works for answers, but not for data the user wants to explore — a revenue chart they can hover ...Read more

https://gofastmcp.com/llms-full.txt


How FastMCP apps work under the hood — from Python to pixels. <VersionBadge /> This page explains how Prefab apps work under the hood — how your Python code ...Read more

github.com
github.com
Releases · PrefectHQ/fastmcp


Verified on Apr 13, 2026, 06:38 PM. Learn about vigilant mode. Compare. Choose ... fix: stop suppressing server stderr in fastmcp call by @jlowin in #3283 ...Read more

OnlyTerp/windsurf-unlocked: Every feature Cascade ships ...


17 Apr 2026 — SWE 1.6 (April 7, 2026) is the new in-house frontier agentic coding model. Highlights from the release notes: 10%+ better on SWE-Bench Pro than ...Read more

README.md - j178/prek


17 Apr 2026 — GitHub stars are current as of April 15, 2026. apache/airflow 45,050 ... jlowin/fastmcp 24,539 stars; apache/iggy 4,116 stars; apache ...Read more

dylanhogg/awesome-python


jlowin/fastmcp ⭐ 22,279 FastMCP is the standard framework for building MCP servers and clients. FastMCP 1.0 was incorporated into the official MCP Python SDK.Read more

fastmcp-me/fastmcp-python: 🚀 The fast, Pythonic way to ...


FastMCP 1.0 was incorporated into the official MCP Python SDK in 2024. This is FastMCP 2.0, the actively maintained version that provides a complete toolkit for ...Read more

GitHub's official MCP Server


The GitHub MCP Server connects AI tools directly to GitHub's platform. This gives AI agents, assistants, and chatbots the ability to read repositories and code ...Read more

MCP Registry


A faster, safer way to build with AI: the GitHub MCP Registry centralizes MCP servers for effortless discovery, integration, and open collaboration.

openai/openai-apps-sdk-examples: Example apps for the ...


Within the Apps SDK, MCP keeps the server, model, and UI in sync. By standardizing the wire format, authentication, and metadata, it lets ChatGPT reason about ...Read more

Model Context Protocol (MCP) Security


8 Jan 2026 — Security analysis of the June (2025-06-18) and latest revised specification MCP transport and protocol layers; Threat modeling strategies for ...Read more

SEP-1724: Extensions · Issue #1724


28 Oct 2025 — This SEP establishes a lightweight framework for extending the Model Context Protocol through optional, composable extensions. This proposal ...

SEP: Extension Negotiation · Issue #1849


19 Nov 2025 — If the client is requesting the use of an extension that is under development (see the SEP for “Extension Versioning”), then it MUST NOT include ...

Where software is built


#1112 In modelcontextprotocol/typescript-sdk;. · YashwantRamAB opened on Nov 14, 2025. Implement SEP-990: Enterprise Managed Authorization (Extension) · auth ...

SEP-1299: Server-Side Authorization Management with ...


4 Aug 2025 — This SEP proposes moving OAuth authorization flow management from MCP Clients to MCP Servers, eliminating the need for dynamic client ...

[notes] Auth WG Meeting, September 10th, 2025 · Issue #1457


Profiles vs. extension. The discussion started around the work that @aaronpk has been driving around enterprise-managed profiles. We discussed how this work ...

Proposal: Fine-Grained Resource Control for Multi-User ...


This design leverages existing enterprise auth infrastructure (increasing adoptability) and keeps MCP servers stateless; It could also enable the server to ...

Model Context Protocol


The Model Context Protocol (MCP) is an open protocol that enables seamless integration between LLM applications and external data sources and tools.

SEP-1299: Server-Side Authorization Management with ...


4 Aug 2025 — This SEP proposes moving OAuth authorization flow management from MCP Clients to MCP Servers, eliminating the need for dynamic client ...

Multi-user Authorization #234


I'd like to propose adding tool-level authorization to MCP. This would let servers declare which OAuth scopes a tool needs and let clients pass user tokens at ...

tolkonepiu/best-of-mcp-servers


This curated list contains 400 awesome MCP (Model Context Protocol) servers with a total of 960K stars grouped into 34 categories. All projects are ranked by a ...Read more

Releases · jdx/fnox


Added. MCP server for secret-gated AI agent access (#343) -- @jdx. The new fnox mcp command starts a Model Context Protocol server over stdio with two tools ...Read more

jeremylongshore/claude-code-plugins-plus-skills


4 days ago — Powered by self-hosted Umami via MCP (Model Context Protocol) — agents call the Umami API in real time to pull visitor counts, pageviews, ...Read more

zazencodes-season-2/src/mcp-server-analysis/workbook. ...


YouTube video source code for Season 2: AI Engineering - zazencodes-season-2/src/mcp-server-analysis/workbook.ipynb at main ...

ai-boost/awesome-harness-engineering


2 days ago — The next evolution of the Agents SDK — OpenAI's April 2026 update adding native sandbox execution, configurable memory, and sandbox-aware ...Read more

CVE-2025-66416 · GitHub Advisory Database


2 Dec 2025 — Description. The Model Context Protocol (MCP) Python SDK does not enable DNS rebinding protection by default for HTTP-based servers.Read more

DNS Rebinding Protection Disabled by Default in Model ...


2 Dec 2025 — The Model Context Protocol (MCP) TypeScript SDK does not enable DNS rebinding protection by default for HTTP-based servers.Read more

Sensitive Environment Variable Exposure via Untrusted ...


9 Apr 2026 — PraisonAI's MCP (Model Context Protocol) integration allows spawning background servers via stdio using user-supplied command strings (e.g., ...Read more

Model Context Protocol (MCP) TypeScript SDK does not ...


2 Dec 2025 — The Model Context Protocol (MCP) TypeScript SDK does not enable DNS rebinding protection by default for HTTP-based servers.Read more

MCP Python SDK


The Model Context Protocol (MCP) lets you build servers that expose data and functionality to LLM applications in a secure, standardized way.Read more

Go SDK: Design · modelcontextprotocol · Discussion #364


This document discusses the design of a Go SDK for the model context protocol. The golang.org/x/tools/internal/mcp package contains a prototype that we built ...Read more

PraisonAI Vulnerable to Sensitive Environment Variable ...


9 Apr 2026 — PraisonAI's MCP (Model Context Protocol) integration allows spawning background servers via stdio using user-supplied command strings (e.g., ...Read more

Comprehensive TypeScript MCP server for Cisco Support ...


A production-ready TypeScript MCP (Model Context Protocol) server for Cisco Support APIs with comprehensive security and dual transport support.Read more

modelcontextprotocol/servers at aiagentsfirst.com


The servers in this repository are intended as reference implementations to demonstrate MCP features and SDK usage. They are meant to serve as educational ...

CLAUDE.md - Cisco Support MCP Server


A comprehensive TypeScript MCP (Model Context Protocol) server for Cisco Support APIs with both stdio and HTTP transport support.Read more

DNS Rebinding Protection Disabled by Default in Model ...


2 Dec 2025 — Description. The Model Context Protocol (MCP) Python SDK does not enable DNS rebinding protection by default for HTTP-based servers.Read more

nokia/modelcontextprotocol-servers: Model Context ...


This repository is a collection of reference implementations for the Model Context Protocol (MCP), as well as references to community-built servers and ...Read more

soufianetahiri/mception


7 days ago — An MCP server that audits other MCP servers for security risks. Give it a target — a local path, pypi:… package, npm:… package, git+…Read more

modelcontextprotocol/servers at xaviergeerinck.com


Clix MCP Server - Clix MCP Server that enables AI agents to provide real-time, trusted Clix documentation and SDK code examples for seamless integrations.Read more

modelcontextprotocol/inspector: Visual testing tool for MCP ...


The inspector runs both an MCP Inspector (MCPI) client UI (default port 6274) and an MCP Proxy (MCPP) server (default port 6277).Read more

Awesome Model Context Protocol (MCP) Servers


MCP (Model Context Protocol) is an open protocol that enables AI models to securely interact with local and remote resources via standardized server ...Read more

MCP server — protocol-level enforcement for multi-agent ...


15 Mar 2026 — Summary. Run omamori as an MCP (Model Context Protocol) server to provide safety checks to any MCP-compatible AI agent (Codex CLI, ...Read more

Discussion on #6 - CLI & MCP Support · foss42 apidash


MCP Server → TypeScript. Because the official: @modelcontextprotocol/sdk. is the most mature and widely adopted. Most MCP servers in production are TypeScript, ...Read more

GHSA-pj2r-f9mw-vrcq.json - github/advisory-database


10 Apr 2026 — Security vulnerability database inclusive of CVEs and GitHub originated security advisories from the world of open source software.

elsahafy/ux-mcp-server: MCP server ...


Model Context Protocol (MCP) server that provides comprehensive UX best practices covering the complete UX ecosystem: accessibility guidelines (WCAG), ...Read more

SEP-1576: Mitigating Token Bloat in MCP: Reducing ...


29 Sept 2025 — This SEP proposes a set of optimizations to mitigate token overhead and improve tool selection efficiency in the Model Context Protocol (MCP).Read more

Organization / Enterprise Allow List for MCP Servers / Tools ...


11 Aug 2025 — GitHub announced MCP registry + allow-list enforcement for Copilot in VS Code Insiders (available now) with a plan to reach VS Code Stable ...Read more

MCP Registry | GitHub · GitHub


A faster, safer way to build with AI: the GitHub MCP Registry centralizes MCP servers for effortless discovery, integration, and open collaboration.

Create your first Copilot MCP registry for VSCode #180943


2 Dec 2025 — This guide walks through building a curated registry, exposing it securely, enforcing it at the GitHub Enterprise / org level, and verifying ...Read more

Context7 Platform - Up-to-date Code Docs For Any Prompt


Works in two modes: CLI + Skills — installs a skill that guides your agent to fetch docs using ctx7 CLI commands (no MCP required); MCP — ...Read more

Specification and documentation for Agent Skills


Agent Skills are a simple, open format for giving agents new capabilities and expertise. Skills are folders of instructions, scripts, and resources that ...

agentskills/README.md at main


Agent Skills are a simple, open format for giving agents new capabilities and expertise. Skills are folders of instructions, scripts, and resources that agents ...Read more

choutos/agent-skills-spec: Open specification for ...


This specification emerged from running 9 AI agents in daily production since February 2026. The skill system evolved through practical use: fixing servers, ...

Agent Skills


17 Dec 2025 — Agent Skills are a simple, open format for giving agents new capabilities and expertise. Skills are folders of instructions, scripts, ...Read more

sample-strands-agents-agentskills/examples/README.md ...


Example List · Most natural usage, when flexible integration is needed · When explicit skill activation is needed, when token usage tracking is needed · When ...Read more

npm-agentskills/README.md at main


Agent Skills provide contextual documentation that AI coding assistants load automatically. When developers use your library, their AI agent reads your skill to ...Read more

README.md - akshayaggarwal99/agentskills


Skills are folders of instructions and resources that teach Claude how to complete specific tasks. This CLI makes it easy to discover and use them. Installation.

a2aproject/A2A: Agent2Agent (A2A) is an open protocol ...


The Agent2Agent (A2A) protocol addresses a critical challenge in the AI landscape: enabling gen AI agents, built on diverse frameworks by different companies.Read more

pulsemcp/mcp-servers


MCP (Model Context Protocol) Servers authored and maintained by the PulseMCP team. We build reliable servers thoughtfully designed specifically for MCP ...

list nexus-agents on MCP registries, directories, and plugin ...


8 Apr 2026 — Goal Get nexus-agents listed on every major MCP directory and AI tool marketplace. Submission Targets (by priority) Tier 1 — Official ...

jlowin.dev
jlowin.dev
FastMCP 3.0 is GA - Mostly Harmless


18 Feb 2026 — FastMCP 3.0 is stable and generally available. Terminal window. pip install fastmcp -U. It's been about a month since the first beta.Read more

Stop Calling Tools, Start Writing Code (Mode) - Mostly Harmless


3 Mar 2026 — A server with two hundred tools dumps two hundred schemas into the context window before the LLM reads a single word of the user's request: tens ...Read more

firecrawl.dev
firecrawl.dev
How to Build MCP Servers in Python: Complete FastMCP ...


Update (January 2026): FastMCP 3.0 was released on January 19, 2026, introducing powerful new features including component versioning, granular authorization, ...Read more

developers.openai.com
developers.openai.com
Building MCP servers for ChatGPT Apps and API integrations


In this guide, we'll cover how to build a remote MCP server that reads data from a private data source (a vector store) and makes it available in ChatGPT as a ...Read more

Quickstart – Apps SDK


To build an app for ChatGPT with the Apps SDK, you need: A Model Context Protocol (MCP) server (required) that defines your app's capabilities (tools) and ...Read more

MCP – Apps SDK


With Apps SDK, MCP is the backbone that keeps server, model, and UI in sync. By standardising the wire format, authentication, and metadata, it lets ChatGPT ...Read more

Apps SDK


Learn how to use Apps SDK by OpenAI. Our framework to build apps for ChatGPT ... MCP Apps in ChatGPT · MCP Server · UX principles · UI guidelines. Plan. Research ...Read more

MCP Apps compatibility in ChatGPT – Apps SDK


The Apps SDK is a supported way to build and distribute ChatGPT Apps. ... This section maps common Apps SDK patterns to MCP Apps standard equivalents.Read more

Build your MCP server – Apps SDK


By the end of this guide, you'll know how to connect your backend MCP server to ChatGPT, define tools, register UI templates, and tie everything together ...Read more

Docs MCP


OpenAI hosts a public Model Context Protocol (MCP) server for developer documentation on developers.openai.com and platform.openai.com.Read more

Build your ChatGPT UI – Apps SDK


Use the MCP Apps bridge (recommended). ChatGPT implements the open MCP Apps standard for app interfaces. For new apps, use the bridge by default:.Read more

Connect from ChatGPT – Apps SDK


Once you have developer mode enabled, you can create a connector for your app in ChatGPT. Ensure your MCP server is reachable over HTTPS (for local development, ...Read more

App submission guidelines – Apps SDK


MCP tools act as the manual for ChatGPT to use your app. Clear, accurate tool definitions make your app safer, easier for the model to understand, and easier ...Read more

Authentication – Apps SDK


Client – ChatGPT acting on behalf of the user. It supports dynamic client registration and PKCE. MCP authorization spec requirements. Host protected resource ...Read more

Function calling | OpenAI API


7 Aug 2025 — Function calling (also known as tool calling) provides a powerful and flexible way for OpenAI models to interface with external systems and ...Read more

Using tools | OpenAI API


When generating model responses or building agents, you can extend capabilities using built‑in tools, function calling, tool search, and remote MCP servers.Read more

Assistants Function Calling | OpenAI API


Step 1: Define functions. When creating your assistant, you will first define the functions under the tools param of the assistant.Read more

docs.cloud.google.com
docs.cloud.google.com
Use the Gemini Cloud Assist remote MCP server


4 days ago — Learn how to use the Gemini Cloud Assist remote MCP server to design infrastructure, investigate issues, manage resources, and optimize ...

community.openai.com
community.openai.com
ChatGPT Apps SDK


Clarification on MCP Server URL and Versioning During ChatGPT App Update Submission. 0, 29, April 24, 2026 ; Citation format issue with Chat Kit in Agent Builder.Read more

Future of ChatGPT Apps SDK with MCP ...


28 Jan 2026 — With the announcement of MCP Apps as an official MCP extension ... October 7, 2025. What kind of new tooling can we expect in the near ...Read more

When Do Our Apps Surface To Users? Clarification ...


3 days ago — Good day OpenAI Team, I'm reaching out on behalf of our group to request some clarification on how and when apps are surfaced to users.

Show us what you're building with the ChatGPT Apps SDK


5 Dec 2025 — October 22, 2025. MCP server tools now in ChatGPT -- developer mode ... Custom MCP connector no longer showing all tools as enabled.Read more

DevDay 2025: Apps SDK, Sora 2, GPT-5 Pro, AgentKit, ...


6 Oct 2025 — Apps SDK: You can start building and testing apps in ChatGPT with the Apps SDK preview, which we're releasing today as an open standard built on ...Read more

When or how to enable the ChatGPT Developer Mode UI ...


17 Oct 2025 — When or how to enable the ChatGPT Developer Mode UI components for Apps SDK? ; October 17, 2025, 6:54am 1 · 947×1073 55.3 KB ; October 17, 2025, 10 ...Read more

cloud.google.com
cloud.google.com
Announcing official MCP support for Google services


10 Dec 2025 — Google's existing API infrastructure is now enhanced to support MCP, providing a unified layer across all Google and Google Cloud services.

Level Up Your Agents: Announcing Google's Official Skills ...


5 days ago — Announcing Google's official Agent Skills repository, launched at Cloud Next 2026. Equip your AI agents with condensed, real-time expertise ...

fantasy.co
fantasy.co
The Apps In ChatGPT Playbook - Brand Strategy (2026 ...


6 Oct 2025 — Updated April 2026: How Apps in ChatGPT work, what the Apps SDK and MCP enable, and how brands should plan discovery, UX, safety, ...

ai.google.dev
ai.google.dev
Set up your coding assistant with Gemini MCP and Skills


1 Apr 2026 — Install Gemini API skills to give your AI coding assistant access to the latest documentation and best practices.

code.visualstudio.com
code.visualstudio.com
Add and manage MCP servers in VS Code


Learn how to add and manage Model Context Protocol (MCP) servers with GitHub Copilot in Visual Studio Code.

nettpilot.com
nettpilot.com
Google Gemini for Business 2026 - Nettpilot


6 Apr 2026 — Does Gemini support MCP (Model Context Protocol)?. Yes. MCP support was added to the Gemini API and SDK in March 2026. Gemini can now use MCP ...

docs.github.com
docs.github.com
About Model Context Protocol (MCP)


Model Context Protocol (MCP) is a protocol that allows you to extend the capabilities of GitHub Copilot by integrating it with other systems.

Configure an MCP registry for your organization or enterprise


To create a valid MCP registry that is reachable by GitHub Copilot, the registry must meet the following requirements: Endpoint and specification ...Read more

About agent skills - GitHub Docs


The Agent Skills specification is an open standard, used by a range of different AI systems. You can create your own skills to teach Copilot to perform ...

mcpjam.com
mcpjam.com
Building with OpenAI Apps SDK and MCPJam Inspector


9 Oct 2025 — Learn how to test and develop OpenAI Apps SDK servers using MCPJam's open source inspector. Complete guide with examples and step-by-step ...

blog.google
blog.google
Improve coding agents' performance with Gemini API Docs ...


The Gemini API Docs MCP (https://gemini-api-docs-mcp.dev) connects your coding agent to the current Gemini API documentation, SDKs and model ...

speakeasy.com
speakeasy.com
Using the OpenAI Apps SDK with Gram Functions - Speakeasy


22 Jan 2026 — This walkthrough demonstrates how to build and deploy an interactive ChatGPT App using the OpenAI Apps SDK backed by Gram Functions. It covers:.Read more

developers.google.com
developers.google.com
Configure the Google Workspace MCP servers


5 days ago — To add the Google Workspace remote MCP servers to your Gemini CLI, add the server configuration to your settings.json file. Create an OAuth 2.0 ...

devblogs.microsoft.com
devblogs.microsoft.com
Agent mode is now generally available with MCP support


17 Jun 2025 — Agent mode turns GitHub Copilot into an autonomous pair programmer capable of handling multi-step development tasks from end to end.Read more

Introducing the new hosted agents in Foundry Agent Service


4 days ago — We first previewed hosted agents last year at Microsoft Ignite, but this refresh is a fundamentally different experience: secure per-session ...Read more

PowerShell, OpenSSH, and DSC team investments for 2026


17 Feb 2026 — To support this, we plan to develop a team supported Model Context Protocol (MCP) server and associated tools that can be used to integrate AI ...Read more

Complete Developer Journey with Microsoft Foundry


5 days ago — Build once in Foundry, consume anywhere: create a toolbox, store your configuration in Foundry, and connect any MCP client to the same endpoint ...Read more

Extend your coding agent with .NET Skills


9 Mar 2026 — For Visual Studio 2026, install the .github + MCP extension that includes skills and agents from several sources, including dotnet/skills .Read more

Azure Developer CLI (azd) - March 2026: Run and Debug ...


30 Mar 2026 — The Azure Developer CLI ( azd ) shipped seven releases in March 2026. Most notably, azd now has a local run-and-debug loop for AI agents, ...Read more

MCP Registry and Allowlist Controls for Copilot in ...


28 Oct 2025 — After the MCP Registry loads, you can browse, install, or uninstall MCP servers from the registry. Optionally, click Configure MCP Registry URL ...Read more

Announcing Foundry MCP Server (preview) in the cloud ...


3 Dec 2025 — Foundry MCP Server. At Build 2025, we published an experimental MCP server for Microsoft Foundry (formerly known as Azure AI Foundry) ...Read more

blogs.windows.com
blogs.windows.com
Ignite 2025: Furthering Windows as the premier platform for ...


18 Nov 2025 — Public preview of Windows On-Device Registry (ODR), a secure, manageable repository of agent connectors, which are just MCP servers. Public ...

Windows security and resiliency innovations help ...


18 Nov 2025 — Default security policy: To help ensure a secure by default starting point, the MCP servers must meet the platform security bar around packaging ...

Advancing Windows for AI development: New platform ...


19 May 2025 — We're committed to making the MCP Registry for Windows an ecosystem of trustworthy MCP servers that meet strong security baseline criteria. User ...

Announcing Windows 11 Insider Preview Build 26220.7344 ...


5 Dec 2025 — By default, all agent connectors in the Windows on-device registry will be contained in a secure environment with their own identity and audit ...

Microsoft 365 Copilot の新機能 | 2025 年 11 月 & 12 月


5 Feb 2026 — MCP サーバーを利用するエージェントをクリックすると、専用の詳細セクションに移動し、サーバーの URL、認証タイプ、動的/静的ステータスを確認できます ...

learn.microsoft.com
learn.microsoft.com
Inventory and Discover MCP Servers in Your API Center


2 Apr 2026 — Register a remote MCP server · Sign in to the Azure portal and go to your API center. · In the sidebar menu, under Inventory, select Assets.

MCP servers on Windows overview


18 Nov 2025 — Registering your MCP server enables agents on Windows to easily discover and connect to your server, provides greater security for your users ...Read more

Azure MCP Server


18 Feb 2026 — The Azure MCP Server enables AI agents and clients to interact with Azure resources using natural language commands.

Build and register a Model Context Protocol (MCP) server


16 Apr 2026 — This article shows you how to create a remote MCP server using Azure Functions, register it in a private organizational tool catalog using Azure ...Read more

Using Azure API Center as an MCP registryhow to setup ...


3 Mar 2026 — Mar 3, 2026, 11:48 PM. Using Azure API Center as an MCP registry. We setup this MCP Registry with Azure PI Center, but seems not work. Azure ...

Model Context Protocol (MCP) on Windows overview


12 Dec 2025 — Learn what MCP is and how Windows integrates discovery, consent, and enterprise controls to make MCP servers easy to build and ship.

Get started with the Azure MCP Server


The Azure MCP Server enables AI-powered development tools to interact with Azure cloud services through the Model Context Protocol (MCP).

Secure MCP servers on Azure Container Apps


13 Apr 2026 — Learn how to authenticate and authorize MCP servers on Azure Container Apps using Microsoft Entra ID or API key authentication.

Overview of Microsoft MCP Server for Enterprise (preview)


25 Nov 2025 — Microsoft MCP Server for Enterprise enables AI agents to query enterprise identity data using natural language through the Model Context ...

Plugins in Semantic Kernel


10 Dec 2024 — Using plugins within Semantic Kernel is always a three step process: Define your plugin; Add the plugin to your kernel ... © Microsoft 2026.Read more

AI Integrations for Semantic Kernel


5 Mar 2025 — Semantic Kernel provides a wide range of AI service integrations to help you build powerful AI agents.Read more

Semantic Kernel documentation


Semantic Kernel documentation. Learn to build robust, future-proof AI solutions that evolve with technological advancements.Read more

Introduction to Semantic Kernel


24 Jun 2024 — Semantic Kernel is a lightweight, open-source development kit that lets you easily build AI agents and integrate the latest AI models into your C#, Python, or ...Read more

Configuring Agents with Semantic Kernel Plugins.


22 May 2025 — The Semantic Kernel Plugin architecture offers a flexible framework to support Function Calling. For an Agent, integrating Plugins and Function Calling is ...Read more

Semantic Kernel to Agent Framework Migration Guide


Learn how to migrate from the Semantic Kernel Agent Framework to Microsoft Agent Framework.

Semantic Kernel Agent Framework


6 May 2025 — The Semantic Kernel Agent Framework provides a platform within the Semantic Kernel eco-system that allow for the creation of AI agents.Read more

Microsoft Agent Framework Overview


6 Apr 2026 — Build AI agents and multi-agent workflows in .NET and Python with Microsoft Agent Framework.

Using MCP tools with Agents


2 Apr 2026 — Microsoft Agent Framework supports integration with Model Context Protocol (MCP) servers, allowing your agents to access external tools and ...Read more

Microsoft Foundry docs: What's new for April 2026


17 Apr 2026 — This article highlights key changes and updates in Microsoft Foundry documentation for April 2026. New articles. Agentic Workflows: Task ...Read more

Agent Framework documentation


Agent Framework documentation. Learn to build robust, future-proof Agentic AI solutions that evolve with technological advancements.Read more

Using MCP tools with Foundry Agents


3 days ago — This section explains how to create a Microsoft Foundry-backed Python agent with a hosted Model Context Protocol (MCP) server integration.Read more

Get started with Agent Framework


1 Apr 2026 — A step-by-step tutorial to build your first agent and progressively add tools, conversations, memory, workflows, and hosting.

agent_framework.MCPStdioTool class


This class connects to MCP servers that communicate via standard input/output, typically used for local processes. Initialize the MCP stdio tool. Note. The ...Read more

Add plugins from a MCP Server


11 Sept 2025 — Semantic Kernel allows you to add plugins from a MCP Server to your agents. This is useful when you want to use plugins that are made available as a MCP Server.Read more

Microsoft Agent Framework Overview


Build AI agents and multi-agent workflows in .NET and Python with Microsoft Agent Framework.

Tools Overview


2 Apr 2026 — Agent Framework supports many different types of tools that extend agent capabilities. Tools allow agents to interact with external systems ...Read more

Add and manage tools


9 Mar 2026 — The Tooling module helps developers discover, configure, and integrate Model Context Protocol (MCP) servers into AI agent workflows. MCP servers ...Read more

Use Model Context Protocol for finance and operations apps


11 Mar 2026 — Learn how to use a Model Context Protocol (MCP) server to create and extend agents for Microsoft Dynamics 365 finance and operations apps.

Python 2026 Significant Changes Guide


2 Apr 2026 — Guide to significant changes in Python releases for Microsoft Agent Framework in 2026, including breaking changes and important enhancements.

Work IQ MCP overview (preview)


3 Apr 2026 — Learn about available Work IQ MCP tooling servers in Microsoft Agent 365 that provide integration with Outlook, Word, Teams, Dataverse, ...

Visual Studio 2026 release notes


Copilot agents in Visual Studio can now automatically discover skills. Agent skills are reusable instruction sets that teach agents how to handle specific tasks ...Read more

Orchestrate your Agents with Microsoft Agent Framework


3 Feb 2026 — NET that enables building, orchestrating, and deploying AI agents with support for streaming, checkpointing, and human-in-the-loop capabilities.Read more

agent_framework.HostedMCPTool class


Represents a MCP tool that is managed and executed by the service. Create a hosted MCP tool.

MCP server learning resources - .NET


17 Sept 2025 — A Microsoft-official GitHub repository with a full, hands-on curriculum for developing MCP servers in .NET, Java, TypeScript, JavaScript, Rust, ...Read more

agent_framework package


Base class for all Agent Framework agents. This class provides core functionality for agent implementations, including context providers, middleware support ...Read more

agent_framework.MCPStreamableHTTPTool class


MCP tool for connecting to HTTP-based MCP servers. This class connects to MCP servers that communicate via streamable HTTP/SSE.

Plugin Marketplace in Azure SRE Agent


27 Mar 2026 — Browse, discover, and install community-built skills and MCP integrations from curated plugin marketplaces in Azure SRE Agent.

Official Microsoft Copilot Studio documentation


Microsoft Agents Framework. Explore Microsoft Agents Framework, an open-source development kit for building AI agents and multi-agent workflows. Microsoft ...Read more

Agents hub - Start here for agentic computing at Microsoft


Explore Microsoft's agent ecosystem, learn key concepts, and find resources to plan, build, adopt, and continuously improve AI agents for your organization.

platform.openai.com
platform.openai.com
OpenAI Platform


Developer Docs. Get started with the OpenAI API · API Reference. Explore endpoints and parameters · Starter Apps. Sample apps built with the API · Cookbooks.

Create voice consent | OpenAI API Reference


OpenAI Developers · Home · API · Docs. Guides and concepts for the OpenAI API ... Apps SDK · Commerce · Home · Changelog · Docs MCP ... Authorization: Bearer $ ...

List voice consents | OpenAI API Reference


OpenAI Developers · Home · API · Docs. Guides and concepts for the OpenAI API ... Apps SDK · Commerce · Home · Changelog · Docs MCP ... "Authorization: Bearer $ ...

openai.com
openai.com
Introducing apps in ChatGPT and the new Apps SDK


6 Oct 2025 — October 6, 2025. Product. Introducing apps in ChatGPT and the new Apps ... The Apps SDK builds on the Model Context Protocol (MCP), the ...Read more

Developers can now submit apps to ChatGPT


17 Dec 2025 — Developers can use the Apps SDK—now in beta—to build chat-native experiences that bring context and action directly into ChatGPT. The strongest ...Read more

OpenAI co-founds the Agentic AI Foundation under ...


9 Dec 2025 — OpenAI co-founds the Agentic AI Foundation under the Linux Foundation and donates AGENTS.md to support open, interoperable standards for ...

help.openai.com
help.openai.com
ChatGPT Business - Release Notes


3 days ago — Learn more about company knowledge and custom MCP connectors. November 13, 2025. Apps & Apps SDK now available to Business plans. ChatGPT ...Read more

ChatGPT Enterprise & Edu - Release Notes


9 Apr 2026 — November 13, 2025. Apps & Apps SDK now available to Enterprise/Edu plans. ChatGPT Enterprise/Edu customers will now have access to ChatGPT apps.Read more

Function Calling in the OpenAI API


Function calling allows you to connect OpenAI models to external tools and systems. This is useful for many things such as empowering AI assistants with ...Read more

docs.anthropic.com
docs.anthropic.com
Claude Code overview - Claude Code Docs


Claude Code is an agentic coding tool that reads your codebase, edits files, runs commands, and integrates with your development tools.

Claude Platform - Claude API Docs


We've launched the MCP connector in public beta, a feature that allows you to connect to remote MCP servers directly from the Messages API. To increase ...Read more

What is the Model Context Protocol (MCP)?


MCP is an open protocol supported across a wide range of clients and servers. AI assistants like Claude and ChatGPT, development tools like Visual Studio Code ...Read more

Tool use with Claude - Claude API Docs


For connecting to MCP servers, see the MCP connector. For building your own MCP client, see modelcontextprotocol.io. Guarantee schema conformance with ...Read more

Use Claude Code in VS Code - Claude Code Docs


The MCP management dialog lets you enable or disable servers, reconnect to a server, and manage OAuth authentication. See the MCP documentation for available ...Read more

Documentation - Claude API Docs


Start building with Claude. Everything you need to integrate Claude into your applications. From first API call to production. What do you want to build?Read more

Advanced setup - Claude Code Docs


Claude Code Docs home page ... Removing configuration files will delete all your settings, allowed tools, MCP server configurations, and session history.Read more

Intro to Claude - Claude API Docs


1. Make your first API call. Set up your environment, install an SDK, and send your first message to Claude. · 2. Understand the Messages API · 3. Choose the ...Read more

Pricing - Claude API Docs


Client-side tools are priced the same as any other Claude API request, while server-side tools may incur additional charges based on their specific usage. The ...Read more

Prompting best practices - Claude API Docs


Comprehensive guide to prompt engineering techniques for Claude's latest models, covering clarity, examples, XML structuring, thinking, and agentic systems.

Web search tool - Claude API Docs


The web search tool gives Claude direct access to real-time web content, allowing it to answer questions with up-to-date information beyond its knowledge ...Read more

Files API - Claude API Docs


1 Jan 2025 — The Files API lets you upload and manage files to use with the Claude API without re-uploading content with each request.Read more

Supported regions - Claude API Docs


Here are the countries, regions, and territories we can currently support access from:

MCP-Connector - Claude API Docs


Geben Sie die URL des MCP-Servers ein. Klicken Sie im rechten Bereich auf die Schaltfläche "Open Auth Settings" nach "Need to configure authentication?".Read more

Client SDKs - Claude API Docs


Official SDKs for building with the Claude API in Python, TypeScript, Java, Go, Ruby, C#, PHP, and the command line.

System Prompts - Claude API Docs


Claude's web interface (claude.ai) and mobile apps use a system prompt to provide up-to-date information, such as the current date, to Claude at the start ...Read more

arxiv.org
arxiv.org
Security Analysis of the Model Context Protocol ...


24 Jan 2026 — We present the first rigorous security analysis of MCP's architectural design, identifying three fundamental protocol-level vulnerabilities: (1) ...Read more

trailofbits.com
trailofbits.com
Secure Your Model Context Protocol


The Model Context Protocol (MCP) is an open standard that enables AI applications to securely connect with data sources and tools. It provides a universal way ...

invariantlabs.ai
invariantlabs.ai
MCP Security Notification: Tool Poisoning Attacks


1 Apr 2025 — We have discovered a critical vulnerability in the Model Context Protocol (MCP) that allows for "Tool Poisoning Attacks." Many major providers ...Read more

WhatsApp MCP Exploited: Exfiltrating your message ...


7 Apr 2025 — This blog post demonstrates how an untrusted MCP server can attack and exfiltrate data from an agentic system that is also connected to a trusted WhatsApp MCP ...Read more

Introducing MCP-Scan: Protecting MCP with Invariant


11 Apr 2025 — A novel security scanning tool designed specifically to protect agentic AI systems from security vulnerabilities when using the Model Context Protocol (MCP).Read more

Announcing our partnership with Smithery


24 Apr 2025 — Invariant developed MCP-Scan, a security scanning tool specifically designed to protect agentic AI systems using MCP. It identifies ...Read more

ox.security
ox.security
The Architectural Flaw at the Core of Anthropic's MCP


15 Apr 2026 — OX researchers uncovered an architectural RCE vulnerability in Anthropic's Model Context Protocol — affecting 150M+ downloads.

MCP STDIO Command Injection: Full Vulnerability Advisory


15 Apr 2026 — OX Security researchers identified a systemic command injection vulnerability in Anthropic's MCP protocol that propagated across the AI ...Read more

Anthropic MCP Vulnerability: How OX VibeSec Protects AI ...


2 days ago — TL;DR: It should go without saying, but any form of vulnerability affecting a platform as widespread and fast moving as Anthropic MCP has a ...Read more

Report – The Mother of All AI Supply Chains


OX Security uncovers Anthropic MCP RCE-by-Design vulnerability exposing 150M+ downloads and 7000+ servers to AI supply chain attacks.

darktrace.com
darktrace.com
7 MCP Risks CISO's Should Consider and How to Prepare


13 Apr 2026 — As Model Context Protocol (MCP) becomes the control plane for autonomous AI agents, it creates a new and largely ungoverned security attack ...

blog.trailofbits.com
blog.trailofbits.com
We built the security layer MCP always needed


28 Jul 2025 — Today we're announcing the beta release of mcp-context-protector, a security wrapper for LLM apps using the Model Context Protocol (MCP).

mcp


15 Nov 2025 — Today we're announcing the beta release of mcp-context-protector, a security wrapper for LLM apps using the Model Context Protocol (MCP).Read more

Jumping the line: How MCP servers can attack you before ...


21 Apr 2025 — This is the first in a series of posts discussing some of the latest security developments in the world of the Model Context Protocol (MCP).Read more

machine-learning


20 Feb 2026 — July 28, 2025. machine-learning, mcp, tool-release. Today we're announcing the beta release of mcp-context-protector ... Context Protocol (MCP).Read more

exploits


13 Jan 2026 — A retrospective on the $100M Balancer hack that occurred in November 2025, including long-term, strategic guidance on how to avoid similar bugs.Read more

proofpoint.com
proofpoint.com
What Is Model Context Protocol (MCP)? Definition


In this guide, we'll explore MCP's architecture, security implications, real-world use cases, adoption strategies, potential risks, and frequently asked ...Read more

docs.litellm.ai
docs.litellm.ai
Command Injection via Anthropic's MCP SDK


6 days ago — On April 15, 2026, OX Security published an advisory covering command-injection in Anthropic's MCP SDK's stdio transport ...Read more

youtube.com
youtube.com
Anthropic's MCP: what OX Security found in 150M downloads


This video shows a critical cybersecurity flaw where claude ai, an AI coding assistant, embeds API keys directly into code from a .env file, ...

OpenAI Function Calling | LLM Tools Essentials


Today I'll show you how you can use function calling with OpenAI API.

thehackernews.com
thehackernews.com
Anthropic MCP Design Vulnerability Enables RCE, ...


MCP design flaw enables RCE across 7000+ servers and 150M downloads, impacting AI SDKs and supply chains.

gist.github.com
gist.github.com
Shipwright PDLC Research - AgentCI (2026-03-28)


28 Mar 2026 — With 10,000+ servers, the MCP ecosystem has exploded past critical mass — but 43% of implementations are vulnerable to command injection, auth ...Read more

theregister.com
theregister.com
MCP 'design flaw' puts 200k servers at risk: Researcher


16 Apr 2026 — According to the security sleuths, the root issue lies in MCP, an open source protocol originally developed by Anthropic that LLMs, AI ...Read more

A friendly introduction to MCP, the USB of AI


21 Apr 2025 — Anthropic thinks it has an answer: MCP, an open protocol that promises to be USB-C for AI. So we took it for a spin to see what works.Read more

itpro.com
itpro.com
AI agents using Anthropic MCP could be a vector for supply chain attacks, claim researchers


Researchers at OX Security have uncovered a critical vulnerability in Anthropic's Model Context Protocol (MCP), a widely adopted AI agent communication standard. This flaw allows arbitrary command execution on servers using vulnerable MCP implementations, posing serious supply chain security risks. The issue enabled researchers to access multiple active services of real companies and conduct over 30 responsible disclosures, resulting in 10 Critical/High CVEs and numerous patches. The vulnerability stems from a GPT Researcher function allowing user-supplied OS commands to be executed via a custom STDIO MCP server configuration—regardless of server startup status. While initially thought to be a flaw in LangChain's MCP adapter, the root of the problem was traced back to Anthropic’s official MCP SDK. Anthropic responded by asserting the behavior was intentional and required user consent, later issuing a security advisory urging caution in usage. However, OX Security criticized this approach, warning that shifting responsibility to developers—who may lack security expertise—exposes users and organizations to substantial risk. Experts warn that this illustrates deeper systemic issues in rapidly expanding AI ecosystems where security often lags functionality, and untested standards can enable large-scale cyberattacks.

Anthropic reveals Claude Opus 4.6, an enterprise-focused model with 1 million token context window for extended code capabilities


Anthropic has introduced Claude Opus 4.6, a significant upgrade of its enterprise-focused AI model, designed for complex knowledge work and agentic coding tasks. A central feature is its one million token context window, allowing it to process entire codebases and handle long, detailed tasks more effectively. The model achieves notable benchmarks, including 65.4% on Terminal-Bench 2.0 and 1,606 on GDPval-AA Elo, outpacing competitors like GPT-5.2 and Gemini 3 Pro. Claude Opus 4.6 also introduces ‘Agent Teams,’ enabling multiple AI agents to collaborate, along with new API features such as ‘adaptive thinking’ and context compaction for long conversations. The model shows advances in knowledge retrieval, especially in legal and financial contexts, and integrates directly with Microsoft 365 apps like Excel and PowerPoint. Customer testimonials highlight its proficiency in tasks such as codebase migration, legal analysis, and autonomous IT issue management. Despite its enhanced capabilities, Claude Opus 4.6 remains priced at $5 per million input tokens and $25 per million output tokens.

Anthropic says MCP will stay 'open, neutral, and community-driven' after donating project to Linux Foundation


Anthropic and OpenAI are donating major AI projects to the Linux Foundation to support the launch of the Agentic AI Foundation (AAIF), a new initiative aimed at fostering open, community-driven innovation in agentic AI. The AAIF, backed by key tech players like AWS, Cloudflare, Google, Block, and Bloomberg, is positioned as a neutral platform to develop tools, standards, and ecosystem support for collaborative AI development. Anthropic is contributing its Model Context Protocol (MCP), originally open-sourced in 2024, to ensure it remains "open, neutral, and community-driven." MCP has become the standard for integrating AI models with external tools and enterprise infrastructure, supporting projects across major platforms such as Claude, Microsoft Copilot, Gemini, and ChatGPT. With over 10,000 MCP servers running globally, it has become a cornerstone of AI integration. OpenAI is also contributing its AGENTS.md format, a universal standard to guide and coordinate AI coding agents. Widely adopted by over 60,000 projects, AGENTS.md enhances reliability and interoperability of agent behavior across repositories. This move reflects OpenAI's commitment to fostering transparency, safety, and shared governance in the AI agent ecosystem.

medium.com
medium.com
The Rise of MCP: How a “USB-C for AI” Is Quietly ...


Think of it like USB-C for AI. Before USB-C, you needed different ... Anthropic donated MCP to the newly formed Agentic AI Foundation under the ...Read more

MCP (Model-Context-Protocol): The USB-C of AI Applications


MCP is an open protocol that standardizes how applications provide context to LLMs. Think of MCP like a USB-C port for AI applications.Read more

Anthropic's Model Context Protocol (MCP): The “USB‑C ...


That's exactly what MCP is doing for AI integrations. With MCP, you don't need a separate adapter for every tool. You get one single protocol ...Read more

The MCP vs. CLI Debate Is the Wrong Fight


Agents discover services through directories, registrations, and protocol-native signals. The official MCP Registry — launched in September 2025 ...Read more

e-dialog.group
e-dialog.group
MCP Simply Explained: The USB-C for AI Agents and Data - e-dialog


Think of MCP like a USB-C port for AI applications. Just as USB-C provides a standardized way to connect electronic devices, MCP provides a standardized way ...

dev.to
dev.to
MCP - The "USB-C Port" for AI Apps


27 Jul 2025 — You can think of MCP like a USB-C port for AI applications. Just like USB-C provides a standardized way to connect your devices to various ...Read more

arstechnica.com
arstechnica.com
MCP: The new “USB-C for AI” that's bringing fierce rivals ...


1 Apr 2025 — MCP: The new “USB-C for AI” that's bringing fierce rivals together. Model context protocol standardizes how AI uses data sources, supported ...Read more

linkedin.com
linkedin.com
Model Context Protocol (MCP): The USB-C Standard for AI


Anthropic describes MCP as “a USB-C port for AI applications” – a single, standardized way to plug language models into various data sources ...Read more

USB-C for AI: Why Your LLM Needs MCP (And Why You ...


Think of MCP like a USB-C port for AI applications. Just as USB-C provides a standardized way to connect your devices to various peripherals ...Read more

Code execution with MCP: Building more efficient agents ...


Anthropic: Code execution with MCP: Building more efficient agents Why Your AI Agent Is Wasting 98% of Its Context Window (And How to Fix ...

Enterprise Teams Shouldn't Overlook MCP's Intended Scope


MCP is a protocol. It defines how agents discover and invoke tools. That's it. Asking why MCP doesn't handle multi-user token lifecycle is like ...Read more

Anthropic Donates Model Context Protocol to Linux ...


The "USB-C of AI" just became public infrastructure. In December 2025, Anthropic donated the Model Context Protocol (MCP) to the Linux ...

Building Enterprise AI with MCP: Security, Observability ...


28 Jan 2026 — MCP servers are now central to enterprise AI. To build production‑grade MCP infrastructure in 2026, teams should focus on security, ...

akuity.io
akuity.io
What is an MCP Server? Why Developers Should Care


25 Jun 2025 — Think of MCP like a USB-C port for AI applications. Just as USB-C provides a standardized way to connect your devices to various accessories, ...Read more

geeklawblog.com
geeklawblog.com
Anthropic's Matt Samuels and Den Delimarsky - Claude & ...


15 Mar 2026 — So, Den, we've heard, like Marlene described in the intro, that MCP is described as the USB-C for AI. As someone who is still using an ...Read more

dev.blues.io
dev.blues.io
Model Context Protocol: Is it the USB-C for AI applications?


23 May 2025 — Model Context Protocol: Is it the USB-C for AI applications? Model Context Protocol: Is it the USB-C for AI applications? ... Anthropic, the ...Read more

kitemetric.com
kitemetric.com
Anthropic's MCP: The USB-C for AI Integration


Anthropic's MCP: The USB-C for AI Integration. Discover Anthropic's Model Context Protocol (MCP), a revolutionary open standard that streamlines AI ...

sitepoint.com
sitepoint.com
MCP (Model Context Protocol): The USB-C for AI ...


20 Mar 2026 — The protocol works like USB-C for AI context: a single, standardized interface that any AI host can use to connect to any compatible data source ...Read more

ministryoftesting.com
ministryoftesting.com
MCP — Model Context Protocol


MCP is an open protocol that standardizes how applications provide context to LLMs. Think of MCP like a USB-C port for AI applications.Read more

entro.security
entro.security
MCP: A “USB-C” for AI - Who's Managing the Identities ...


3 Apr 2025 — MCP: A “USB-C” for AI Is Here: Who's Managing the Identities Behind It? ... In late 2024, Anthropic introduced its open-source Model Context ...Read more

stackone.com
stackone.com
MCP Token Optimization: 4 Approaches Compared


31 Mar 2026 — MCP token optimization addresses two distinct costs that consume an AI agent's context window: schema bloat and response bloat.Read more

MCP: What's Working, What's Broken, and What Comes ...


19 Jan 2026 — The ecosystem needed discovery; by early 2025, thousands of community servers scattered across npm, PyPI, and GitHub repositories prompted the ...Read more

kavasimihaly.github.io
kavasimihaly.github.io
The Hidden Cost of MCPs and Custom Instructions on Your ...


23 Nov 2025 — You're burning a huge portion of your context window before you even paste in your first file. MCP tools alone can consume 16%+ of your window.Read more

layered.dev
layered.dev
MCP Tool Schema Bloat: The Hidden Token Tax (and How to ...


16 Jan 2026 — Your MCP tool descriptions are eating your context window. Learn about the token efficiency problem and solutions emerging at server, ...

apideck.com
apideck.com
Your MCP Server Is Eating Your Context Window. There's ...


5 Apr 2026 — It gets worse. Each MCP tool costs 550-1,400 tokens for its name, description, JSON schema, field descriptions, enums, and system instructions.Read more

yournextstore.com
yournextstore.com
MCP Servers for Ecommerce: The 2026 Developer's Guide


5 days ago — The best MCP servers for ecommerce in 2026: Your Next Store, Stripe, PayPal, Shopify, WooCommerce, and how to build your own.

aimultiple.com
aimultiple.com
Code Execution with MCP: A New Approach to AI Agent ...


22 Jan 2026 — Anthropic introduced a method in which AI agents interact with Model Context Protocol (MCP) servers by writing executable code rather than ...Read more

apigene.ai
apigene.ai
FastMCP 3.0: Build MCP Servers in Python, Fast


12 Apr 2026 — FastMCP is a Python framework that abstracts the complexity of the Model Context Protocol into a clean, decorator-based API. Instead of manually ...Read more

mcpplaygroundonline.com
mcpplaygroundonline.com
Why Your Tools Are Silently Eating Your Context Window


15 Apr 2026 — This is one of the most overlooked costs in MCP-based AI systems, and it compounds silently as you add more tools to your server. Table of ...Read more

pub.towardsai.net
pub.towardsai.net
Is MCP Dead? The Context Crisis That Broke Naive Tool ...


2 Apr 2026 — Too many tool schemas cost a lot of tokens. And once those tokens are sitting in the context window, they do not just raise price. They ...Read more

OpenAI Function Calling Works Great, Until You Have 340 ...


19 Feb 2026 — We deployed GPT function calling across 340 internal tools and 12 enterprise tenants. This is what broke and what we built to fix it.Read more

aaif.io
aaif.io
MCP Is Now Enterprise Infrastructure: Everything That ...


13 Apr 2026 — His framing was that 2025 proved MCP was needed, and 2026 is about making it production-ready. He closed with the context bloat criticism head- ...Read more

github.blog
github.blog
MCP registry and allowlist controls for VS Code Stable in ...


18 Nov 2025 — Enterprise and organization administrators can now configure MCP registries and enforce allowlist policies in the latest release of VS Code ...Read more

MCP registry and allowlist controls for Copilot in JetBrains, ...


28 Oct 2025 — Open GitHub Copilot for Xcode, sign in, and click Configure MCP server in the chat panel. Under MCP registry URL, click Browse MCP Servers… to ...Read more

developer.microsoft.com
developer.microsoft.com
Connect Once, Integrate Anywhere with MCP


21 May 2025 — A registry for MCP servers is crucial for central management, discovery, and standardized connectivity. It allows organizations to keep track of ...Read more

truefoundry.com
truefoundry.com
Best MCP Registries in 2026: Compared for Developers ...


6 Apr 2026 — In this guide, we analyse the best MCP Registries for 2026, looking at how they perform with respect to Discovery, Governance, Hosting and ...Read more

What Is MCP Gateway Registry: Managing Enterprise AI ...


MCP Gateway Registry: The Enterprise Control Plane for AI Agents. By Ashish Dubey. Updated: April 25, 2026. Your Guide to MCP Gateway Registry.Read more

MCP Servers in Cursor: Setup, Configuration, and Security ...


3 Mar 2026 — Learn how to set up, configure, and secure MCP servers in Cursor. This 2026 guide covers stdio vs. Streamable HTTP, mcp.json best practices, ...

Mcp Gateway


5 days ago — Portkey's current MCP docs center on the MCP Gateway + Registry control plane: server onboarding, team/tool provisioning, auth, and ...Read more

What is MCP Registry? Architecture, Benefits & Setup Guide


30 Sept 2025 — Learn what the MCP Registry is, its architecture, verification methods, and how to manage private registries in this detailed blog.

MCP Gateway : Secure, Reliable, and Easy Integration


Seamlessly connect, secure, and manage MCP Servers through a unified MCP gateway - fully discoverable, traceable, and enterprise-grade.Read more

techcommunity.microsoft.com
techcommunity.microsoft.com
MCP Registry with Azure API Center


30 Jul 2025 — Discover how to build a secure, governed, and easily discoverable private MCP registry using Azure API Center. Empower your AI teams with ...

portkey.ai
portkey.ai
A Strategic Perspective on the MCP Registry for ...


9 Sept 2025 — The recent announcement of the official MCP Registry is a significant milestone, signaling a new phase of maturity for the AI ecosystem.Read more

MCP Registry - Portkey Blog


MCP Registry ; Introducing the MCP Gateway · Rohit Agarwal, Ayush, Drishti Shah 21 Jan 2026 ; From standard to ecosystem: the new MCP updates, Nov 2025 · Drishti ...Read more

Introducing the MCP Gateway


21 Jan 2026 — Portkey's MCP Gateway provides a centralized control plane for authenticating, governing, and observing MCP servers and tools as agents move ...

Top MCP Gateways for 2026


A practical guide to MCP gateway covering Kong, Lunar.dev etc. and how Portkey provides a control panel to add MCP servers with hassle-free authentication, ...

MCP - Portkey Blog


Understand the real difference between MCP and function calling. Explore architecture, vendor lock-in issues, security tradeoffs, & when teams should adopt ...Read more

AI in Production Blog • Portkey


24 Apr 2026. Architecting for Trust: A Strategic Perspective on the MCP Registry for the Enterprise. Rohit Agarwal, Vrushank Vyas 09 Sep 2025 ...Read more

inference.sh
inference.sh
Agent Skills: The Open Standard for AI Capabilities | blog


14 Apr 2026 — The Agent Skills format was developed by Anthropic and released as an open standard in late 2025. The specification lives on GitHub at github.Read more

resources.anthropic.com
resources.anthropic.com
The Complete Guide to Building Skills for Claude


MCP provides the professional kitchen: access to tools, ingredients, and equipment. Skills provide the recipes: step-by-step instructions on how to create ...Read more

smithery.ai
smithery.ai
context7-docs - Skill


Curated, current documentation from official sources; Structured format optimized for code generation; Topic filtering for focused results; Version-specific ...Read more

Smithery - Connect agents to MCPs in minutes


The fastest way to extend your AI. Connect to the largest marketplace of MCPs, or publish your own with built-in observability and distribution.

MCPs


Browse MCP servers to extend your AI agent's capabilities. Find and connect to community-built Model Context Protocol servers.

Introduction - Smithery Documentation


Smithery is the largest open marketplace of Model Context Protocol (MCP) servers. Discover and use MCP servers that enable LLMs to search the web, access ...Read more

agentskills.io
agentskills.io
Agent Skills Overview - Agent Skills


What are Agent Skills? Agent Skills are a lightweight, open format for extending AI agent capabilities with specialized knowledge and workflows.Read more

wcowin.work
wcowin.work
Introduction to Agent Skills (Open Standards) - Wcowin's Blog


Agent Skills is an open format for extending domain capabilities for AI agents. This article describes how to discover, install, use, and build your own ...Read more

context7.com
context7.com
Context7 - Up-to-date documentation for LLMs and AI code ...


Pull up-to-date, version-specific documentation and code examples for any library directly into Cursor, Claude Code, Windsurf, and other AI coding tools.

agensi.io
agensi.io
What Is the Agent Skills Open Standard? (2026 Explainer)


12 Apr 2026 — The Agent Skills open standard makes SKILL.md files portable across Claude Code, OpenClaw, and 20+ AI coding agents.

upstash.com
upstash.com
Introducing Context7 Skill Wizard


4 Feb 2026 — The Context7 Skill Wizard auto-generates high-quality skills for AI from up-to-date documentation.

claude.com
claude.com
Equipping agents for the real world with Agent Skills


16 Oct 2025 — Discover how Anthropic builds AI agents with practical capabilities through modular skills, enabling them to handle complex real-world tasks ...

Skills


Skills give Claude details on how you want to create documents, analyze data, and automate workflows, so you get consistent outputs every time.Read more

platform.claude.com
platform.claude.com
Agent Skills - Claude API Docs


Anthropic provides pre-built Agent Skills for common document tasks (PowerPoint, Excel, Word, PDF), and you can create your own custom Skills. Both work the ...Read more

Claude Platform - Claude API Docs


Anthropic-managed Skills: Pre-built Skills for working with PowerPoint (.pptx), Excel (.xlsx), Word (.docx), and PDF files; Custom Skills: Upload your own ...Read more

Claude API skill


An open-source Agent Skill that provides Claude with up-to-date API reference material, SDK documentation, and best practices for building applications with ...

Skills - Claude API Docs


Pre-built Anthropic skills: Common document tasks such as PowerPoint, Excel, Word, and PDF handling. Custom skills: Skills you author and upload to your ...Read more

What's new in Claude Opus 4.7


Claude Opus 4.7 supports the 1M token context window, 128k max output tokens, adaptive thinking, and the same set of tools and platform features as Claude Opus ...Read more

code.claude.com
code.claude.com
Week 14 · March 30 – April 3, 2026


3 Apr 2026 — Interactive lessons that teach Claude Code features through animated demos, right inside your terminal. Claude Code releases frequently, and ...Read more

Extend Claude with skills - Claude Code Docs


Create, manage, and share skills to extend Claude's capabilities in Claude Code. Includes custom commands and bundled skills.

support.claude.com
support.claude.com
Release notes | Claude Help Center


April 17, 2026 ... With Opus 4.7, we also launched Claude Design, a new Anthropic Labs product that lets you collaborate with Claude to create visual outputs like ...Read more

skills.sh
skills.sh
research-grants by davila7/claude-code-templates - Skills


Research Grant Writing. Overview. Research grant writing is the process of developing competitive funding proposals for federal agencies and foundations.

computer-use-agents by davila7/claude-code-templates - Skills


The fundamental architecture of computer use agents: observe screen, reason about next action, execute action, repeat. This loop integrates vision models with ...

Hot AI Agent Skills — Right Now


Skills are reusable capabilities for AI agents. Install them with a single command to enhance your agents with access to procedural knowledge.

kiro.dev
kiro.dev
Agent Skills - IDE - Docs


18 Feb 2026 — Skills are portable instruction packages that follow the open Agent Skills standard. They bundle instructions, scripts, and templates into ...Read more

docs.langchain.com
docs.langchain.com
Home - Docs by LangChain


Create helpful AI agents without code. Start from a template, connect your accounts, and let the agent handle routine work while you stay in control. Learn more ...Read more

Contributing integrations - Docs by LangChain


LangChain provides standard interfaces for several different components (language models, vector stores, etc) that are crucial when building LLM applications.Read more

Changelog - Docs by LangChain


​. @langchain/openai · New provider built-in tools: Support for file search, web search, code interpreter, image generation, computer use, shell, and MCP ...Read more

LangGraph overview - Docs by LangChain


We will commonly use LangChain components throughout the documentation to integrate models and tools, but you don't need to use LangChain to use LangGraph.Read more

Release policy - Docs by LangChain


LangChain 0.3: Status: MAINTENANCE mode; Support period: Until December 2026; Support includes: Security patches and critical bug fixes ...Read more

developers.googleblog.com
developers.googleblog.com
Announcing the Agent2Agent Protocol (A2A)


9 Apr 2025 — The A2A protocol will allow AI agents to communicate with each other, securely exchange information, and coordinate actions on top of various enterprise ...Read more

langchain.com
langchain.com
Tool Calling with LangChain


11 Apr 2024 — TLDR: We are introducing a new tool_calls attribute on AIMessage . More and more LLM providers are exposing API's for reliable tool calling.Read more

Structured Tools


2 May 2023 — Build powerful LangChain agents with Structured Tools. Accept multiple inputs, create complex tool schemas, and unlock advanced AI agent ...

a2aprotocol.ai
a2aprotocol.ai
A2A Protocol - Agent2Agent Communication


A2A is an application level protocol that enables agents to collaborate in their natural modalities. Example. Consider an auto repair shop that fixes cars.Read more

meta-intelligence.tech
meta-intelligence.tech
LLM Function Calling: OpenAI Tools API, Multi-Step ... - 超智諮詢


26 Sept 2025 — In June 2023, OpenAI officially launched the Function Calling API, fundamentally changing this landscape. By injecting large quantities of tool ...Read more

stellagent.ai
stellagent.ai
A2A Protocol Explained: How Google's Agent-to- ...


9 Apr 2026 — A2A (Agent-to-Agent) Protocol is Google's open standard for AI agents to discover and collaborate as peers across frameworks. This 2026 ...

pulsemcp.com
pulsemcp.com
PulseMCP | Keep up-to-date with MCP


Explore the Model Context Protocol. Everything MCP: servers, clients, use cases, tools and a weekly newsletter.Read more

MCP Server Directory: 13490+ updated daily


A daily-updated directory of all Model Context Protocol (MCP) servers available on the internet. Connect your AI apps to external data sources and services.

mcpmarket.com
mcpmarket.com
Registry: Semantic MCP Server Retrieval Tool


The Registry provides a way to discover and utilize MCP Servers through semantic search. It allows users to find specific MCP servers based on their needs.Read more

nordicapis.com
nordicapis.com
Getting Started With the Official MCP Registry API


19 Nov 2025 — Learn how to call the Official MCP Registry API, explore its use cases, and understand its impact on MCP server discovery.

linuxfoundation.org
linuxfoundation.org
Linux Foundation Announces the Formation of the Agentic ...


Platinum members include Amazon Web Services, Anthropic, Block, Bloomberg, Cloudflare, Google, Microsoft and OpenAI. SAN FRANCISCO, Dec. 9, 2025 ...Read more

Linux Foundation Newsletter: December 2025


17 Dec 2025 — Explore the Agentic AI Foundation projects on GitHub and get involved with MCP, goose, and AGENTS.md as they define the future of interoperable ...Read more

CAMARA Charts a Path for Network-Aware AI Applications ...


12 Jan 2026 — The Linux Foundation announced AAIF on December 9, 2025, with ... “With MCP now under the Linux Foundation's Agentic AI Foundation ...Read more

Blog | Linux Foundation | LF Europe


Join us in New York for MCP Dev Summit North ... Linux Foundation Newsletter: December 2025 ... This month, we announced the formation of the Agentic AI...

events.linuxfoundation.org
events.linuxfoundation.org
Linux Foundation Events


Agentic AI Foundation Unveils MCP Dev Summit North America 2026 Schedule ... The Linux Foundation Announces Keynote Speakers for Open Source Summit India 2025.Read more

thenewstack.io
thenewstack.io
Anthropic Donates the MCP Protocol to the Agentic AI ...


9 Dec 2025 — To nobody's surprise, the MCP protocol is now part of a new foundation under the umbrella of the Linux Foundation. Dec 9th, 2025 11:30am by ...Read more

www-cdn.anthropic.com
www-cdn.anthropic.com
NIST RFI on Agentic Security


9 Mar 2026 — All three are open protocols that anyone can build for, and MCP itself was donated to the Agentic AI. Foundation under the Linux Foundation in ...Read more

wired.com
wired.com
OpenAI, Anthropic, and Block Are Teaming Up to Make AI Agents Play Nice


OpenAI, Anthropic, and Block have co-founded the Agentic AI Foundation (AAIF) to establish open standards for AI agents, promoting interoperability and collaboration in the emerging agentic AI space. Under the Linux Foundation's governance, they have donated key technologies: Anthropic’s Model Context Protocol (MCP), OpenAI’s Agents.md, and Block’s Goose framework. These tools, already free to use, will now be developed openly by the community. The AAIF has also gained support from major tech firms like Google, Microsoft, AWS, Bloomberg, and Cloudflare. The move marks a shift from traditional chatbot interfaces toward AI agents that can perform web-based tasks, collaborate, and negotiate. OpenAI's Srinivas Narayanan views open standards as essential for seamless interaction between AI systems, while Block sees widespread developer interest in contributing to Goose’s development. This initiative reflects broader challenges and trends in the AI industry, where the use of open-source tools could influence global AI adoption and potentially give strategic advantages. With parallels to open web standards, the AAIF aims to shape the far-reaching impact of AI agent infrastructure in a transparent and stable manner.

gov.uk
gov.uk
Guidelines and best practices for making government ...


19 Jan 2026 — Model Context Protocol ( MCP ) and agentic workflows represent a modern approach to data interoperability. It allows connections to different ...Read more

comply.com
comply.com
Comply Launches Financial Services' First Agentic ...


5 days ago — Comply Launches Financial Services' First Agentic Compliance Platform MCP Server, Enabling Teams to Build Custom AI Agents Without Developers.Read more

techuk.org
techuk.org
Enabling a Smarter Salesforce Agent Ecosystem for the ...


6 Jun 2025 — The Model Context Protocol (MCP) might sound like yet another acronym in an already crowded space, but what it enables under the hood could ...Read more

databricks.com
databricks.com
MCP-Powered Financial AI Workflows on Databricks


4 Dec 2025 — Learn how Databricks turns MCP into a governed intelligence layer where agents collaborate, reason, and act on live signals with full compliance ...Read more

cdata.com
cdata.com
2026: The Year for Enterprise-Ready MCP Adoption


11 Dec 2025 — Ensuring security and governance in enterprise MCP deployments. Security is the defining requirement in MCP's enterprise adoption curve. Top ...Read more

socitm.net
socitm.net
Cyber security – a chronicle of connectivity and conflict


As information is exchange without intervention through a Model Context Protocol (MCP) server, there is an increased risk in time that poisoned AI models ...Read more

stacklok.com
stacklok.com
MCP Platform for Financial Services


Stacklok's Model Context Protocol (MCP) Platform is built for regulated environments, so you can move from experimentation to production. Security by Design.Read more

State of Model Context Protocol in Software 2026


In our survey, we specifically asked respondents about their organization's adoption of the Model. Context Protocol (MCP). We wanted to understand their ...Read more

mcpmanager.ai
mcpmanager.ai
Enterprise MCP - What Businesses Need To Know


9 Oct 2025 — How do we get the observability we need over MCP servers to monitor and improve usage, performance, security, and impact? In the sections below, ...Read more

assets.publishing.service.gov.uk
assets.publishing.service.gov.uk
Guidelines and best practices for making government ...


1 Jan 2026 — Model Context Protocol (MCP) and agentic workflows represent a modern approach to data interoperability9. It allows connections to different ...Read more

fca.org.uk
fca.org.uk
FCA annual work programme 2026/27


26 Mar 2026 — Our annual work programme details what we will deliver in 2026/27 on our 4 strategic priorities. (Formerly known as our business plan.)

nimblebrain.ai
nimblebrain.ai
The State of MCP Security in 2026


MCP security in 2026 is where web security was in 2005, functional but immature. The protocol itself is sound, but the ecosystem is a mix of well-built ...Read more

blogs.mulesoft.com
blogs.mulesoft.com
Enterprise MCP Strategy: Be Agent-Ready Without the ...


3 Mar 2026

publications.parliament.uk
publications.parliament.uk
AI in financial services: Responses to the Committee's First ...


16 Apr 2026 — HM Treasury and the Financial Conduct Authority provided responses on 18 March 2026 and the Bank of England provided its response on 1 April ...Read more

mintmcp.com
mintmcp.com
Best MCP Gateways for Enterprise Engineering Teams 2026


12 Feb 2026 — Secure, monitor, and scale AI agent deployments with the best MCP gateways for enterprise engineering teams in 2026.

fme.safe.com
fme.safe.com
Model Context Protocol


Public Sector. Challenge: Government agencies face overwhelming citizen inquiries and growing backlogs for permits, zoning, and service requests. Solution ...Read more

traverssmith.com
traverssmith.com
Financial Services Regulatory Roadmap 2026


2 Jan 2026 — The outcome of the UK AIFMR Review, expected in April 2026, will be a key milestone for UK alternative asset managers and will give a useful ...Read more

obot.ai
obot.ai
The Reality of MCP Security: A CTO Action Plan


16 Mar 2026 — This piece maps the threat landscape as it stands in early 2026: six concrete attack patterns with documented mechanics, the adoption gap that ...Read more

drcf.org.uk
drcf.org.uk
The Future of Agentic AI - Foresight paper


31 Mar 2026 — This paper serves as a forward-looking exploration of agentic AI and how UK regulatory frameworks can help realise the opportunities of this ...Read more

Connector sources scanned

No connector sources scanned